src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_utf8_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 نا/146 . 344
SFX 216 Y 2
SFX 216 0 آتٍ/169 . 235
SFX 216 0 آتٍ/169 . 235
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 َةِ/147 . 270
SFX 567 Y 2
SFX 567 0 نِي/204 . 231
SFX 567 0 نا/204 . 231
SFX 315 Y 5
SFX 315 0 ه/207 . 236
SFX 315 0 هما/207 . 236
SFX 315 0 هم/207 . 236
SFX 315 0 ها/207 . 236
SFX 315 0 هنَّ/207 . 236
SFX 316 Y 5
SFX 316 0 كَ/207 . 239
SFX 316 0 كِ/207 . 239
SFX 316 0 كُما/207 . 239
SFX 316 0 كُم/207 . 239
SFX 316 0 كُنَّ/207 . 239
SFX 4 Y 1
SFX 4 0 ُ/152 . 332
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 اً/152 . 337
SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 َةُ/147 . 314
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 آت/159 . 293
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 ا/206 . 242
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 نِي/146 . 345
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 0 نِي/152 . 346
SFX 217 Y 45
SFX 217 0 آته/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتهما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتهم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتها/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتهنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتكَ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتكِ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتكُما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتكُم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتكُنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِي/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتنا/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُهُ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُهُما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُهُم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُها/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُهُنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُكَ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُكِ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُكُما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُكُم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُكُنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتُنا/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِها/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكَ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكِ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكُما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكُم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكُنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِنا/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِها/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِهِنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكَ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكِ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكُما/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكُم/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِكُنَّ/169 . 258
SFX 217 0 آتِنا/169 . 258
SFX 215 Y 2
SFX 215 0 آتِ/169 . 244
SFX 215 0 آتِ/169 . 244
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 ّا/152 . 233
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 ِي/152 . 315
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 0 َيْنِ/144 . 277
SFX 520 Y 7
SFX 520 0 اهُ/203 . 234
SFX 520 0 اهُما/203 . 234
SFX 520 0 اهُم/203 . 234
SFX 520 0 اها/203 . 234
SFX 520 0 اهُنَّ/203 . 234
SFX 520 0 انِي/203 . 234
SFX 520 0 انا/203 . 234
SFX 10 Y 13
SFX 10 0 ا/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اهُ/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اهُما/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اهُم/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اها/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اهُنَّ/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اكَ/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اكِ/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اكُما/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اكُم/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 اكُنَّ/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 ايَ/152 . 245
SFX 10 0 انا/152 . 245
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 َة/152 . 246
SFX 521 Y 5
SFX 521 0 اكَ/203 . 295
SFX 521 0 اكِ/203 . 295
SFX 521 0 اكُما/203 . 295
SFX 521 0 اكُم/203 . 295
SFX 521 0 اكُنَّ/203 . 295
SFX 511 Y 7
SFX 511 0 نِهِ/155 . 294
SFX 511 0 نِهِما/155 . 294
SFX 511 0 نِهِم/155 . 294
SFX 511 0 نِها/155 . 294
SFX 511 0 نِهِنَّ/155 . 294
SFX 511 0 نِنِي/155 . 294
SFX 511 0 نِنا/155 . 294
SFX 499 Y 7
SFX 499 0 نِهِ/145 . 294
SFX 499 0 نِهِما/145 . 294
SFX 499 0 نِهِم/145 . 294
SFX 499 0 نِها/145 . 294
SFX 499 0 نِهِنَّ/145 . 294
SFX 499 0 نِنِي/145 . 294
SFX 499 0 نِنا/145 . 294
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 0/189 . 268
SFX 512 Y 5
SFX 512 0 نِكَ/155 . 296
SFX 512 0 نِكِ/155 . 296
SFX 512 0 نِكُما/155 . 296
SFX 512 0 نِكُم/155 . 296
SFX 512 0 نِكُنَّ/155 . 296
SFX 481 Y 7
SFX 481 0 انِهِ/189 . 335
SFX 481 0 انِهِما/189 . 335
SFX 481 0 انِهِم/189 . 335
SFX 481 0 انِها/189 . 335
SFX 481 0 انِهِنَّ/189 . 335
SFX 481 0 انِنِي/189 . 335
SFX 481 0 انِنا/189 . 335
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 انِ/152 . 249
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 ِي/152 . 292
SFX 500 Y 5
SFX 500 0 نِكَ/145 . 296
SFX 500 0 نِكِ/145 . 296
SFX 500 0 نِكُما/145 . 296
SFX 500 0 نِكُم/145 . 296
SFX 500 0 نِكُنَّ/145 . 296
SFX 469 Y 7
SFX 469 0 انِهِ/190 . 335
SFX 469 0 انِهِما/190 . 335
SFX 469 0 انِهِم/190 . 335
SFX 469 0 انِها/190 . 335
SFX 469 0 انِهِنَّ/190 . 335
SFX 469 0 انِنِي/190 . 335
SFX 469 0 انِنا/190 . 335
SFX 482 Y 5
SFX 482 0 انِكَ/189 . 338
SFX 482 0 انِكِ/189 . 338
SFX 482 0 انِكُما/189 . 338
SFX 482 0 انِكُم/189 . 338
SFX 482 0 انِكُنَّ/189 . 338
SFX 470 Y 5
SFX 470 0 انِكَ/190 . 338
SFX 470 0 انِكِ/190 . 338
SFX 470 0 انِكُما/190 . 338
SFX 470 0 انِكُم/190 . 338
SFX 470 0 انِكُنَّ/190 . 338
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ات/152 . 256
SFX 540 Y 7
SFX 540 0 ْنَهُ/173 . 238
SFX 540 0 ْنَهُما/173 . 238
SFX 540 0 ْنَهُم/173 . 238
SFX 540 0 ْنَها/173 . 238
SFX 540 0 ْنَهُنَّ/173 . 238
SFX 540 0 ْنَنِي/173 . 238
SFX 540 0 ْنَنا/173 . 238
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 ِ/156 . 224
SFX 542 Y 1
SFX 542 0 َّ/173 . 241
SFX 390 Y 7
SFX 390 0 اهُ/206 . 234
SFX 390 0 اهُما/206 . 234
SFX 390 0 اهُم/206 . 234
SFX 390 0 اها/206 . 234
SFX 390 0 اهُنَّ/206 . 234
SFX 390 0 انِي/206 . 234
SFX 390 0 انا/206 . 234
SFX 541 Y 5
SFX 541 0 ْنَكَ/173 . 243
SFX 541 0 ْنَكِ/173 . 243
SFX 541 0 ْنَكُما/173 . 243
SFX 541 0 ْنَكُم/173 . 243
SFX 541 0 ْنَكُنَّ/173 . 243
SFX 33 Y 13
SFX 33 0 َتا/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاهُ/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاهُما/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاهُم/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاها/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاهُنَّ/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاكَ/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاكِ/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاكُما/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاكُم/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتاكُنَّ/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتايَ/152 . 281
SFX 33 0 َتانا/152 . 281
SFX 303 Y 22
SFX 303 0 ْنَهُ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَهُما/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَهُم/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَها/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَهُنَّ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَكَ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَكِ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَكُما/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَكُم/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَكُنَّ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَنِي/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْنَنا/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناهُ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناهُما/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناهُم/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناها/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناهُنَّ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناكَ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناكِ/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناكُما/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناكُم/160 . 324
SFX 303 0 ْناكُنَّ/160 . 324
SFX 561 Y 5
SFX 561 0 ه/149 . 236
SFX 561 0 هما/149 . 236
SFX 561 0 هم/149 . 236
SFX 561 0 ها/149 . 236
SFX 561 0 هنَّ/149 . 236
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 0 انِ/206 . 240
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 0 ٍ/162 . 300
SFX 302 Y 2
SFX 302 0 َّ/160 . 326
SFX 302 0 ّا/160 . 326
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 0 َتانِ/152 . 230
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 آت/156 . 293
SFX 562 Y 5
SFX 562 0 كَ/149 . 239
SFX 562 0 كِ/149 . 239
SFX 562 0 كُما/149 . 239
SFX 562 0 كُم/149 . 239
SFX 562 0 كُنَّ/149 . 239
SFX 78 Y 1
SFX 78 0 َّ/152 . 250
SFX 3 Y 1
SFX 3 0 0/152 . 229
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 0 0/146 . 229
SFX 546 Y 7
SFX 546 0 ْنَهُ/184 . 238
SFX 546 0 ْنَهُما/184 . 238
SFX 546 0 ْنَهُم/184 . 238
SFX 546 0 ْنَها/184 . 238
SFX 546 0 ْنَهُنَّ/184 . 238
SFX 546 0 ْنَنِي/184 . 238
SFX 546 0 ْنَنا/184 . 238
SFX 306 Y 6
SFX 306 0 ُّ/160 . 328
SFX 306 0 َّ/160 . 328
SFX 306 0 ِّ/160 . 328
SFX 306 0 ُّما/160 . 328
SFX 306 0 ُّم/160 . 328
SFX 306 0 ُّنَّ/160 . 328
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 0 َّ/184 . 241
SFX 547 Y 5
SFX 547 0 ْنَكَ/184 . 243
SFX 547 0 ْنَكِ/184 . 243
SFX 547 0 ْنَكُما/184 . 243
SFX 547 0 ْنَكُم/184 . 243
SFX 547 0 ْنَكُنَّ/184 . 243
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 0/206 . 268
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 َتَيْنِ/152 . 276
SFX 137 Y 12
SFX 137 0 هُ/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 هُما/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 هُم/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 ها/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 هُنَّ/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 كَ/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 كِ/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 كُما/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 كُم/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 كُنَّ/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 نِي/146 . 318
SFX 137 0 نا/146 . 318
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 0 نِي/146 . 346
SFX 71 Y 7
SFX 71 0 ِيهِ/152 . 262
SFX 71 0 ِيهِما/152 . 262
SFX 71 0 ِيهِم/152 . 262
SFX 71 0 ِيها/152 . 262
SFX 71 0 ِيهِنَّ/152 . 262
SFX 71 0 ِينِي/152 . 262
SFX 71 0 ِينا/152 . 262
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 0/158 . 229
SFX 146 Y 45
SFX 146 0 ْتُهُ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُهُما/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُهُم/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُها/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُهُنَّ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتَهُ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتَهُما/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتَهُم/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتَها/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتَهُنَّ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتِهِ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتِهِما/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتِهِم/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتِها/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتِهِنَّ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُكَ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُكِ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُكُما/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُكُم/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُكُنَّ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتَنِي/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتَنا/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتِنِي/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتِنا/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُماهُ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُماهُما/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُماهُم/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُماها/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُماهُنَّ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمانِي/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمانا/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمُوهُ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمُوهُما/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمُوهُم/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمُوها/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمُوهُنَّ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمُونِي/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُمُونا/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُنَّهُ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُنَّهُما/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُنَّهُم/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُنَّها/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُنَّهُنَّ/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُنَّنِي/146 . 319
SFX 146 0 ْتُنَّنا/146 . 319
SFX 51 Y 12
SFX 51 0 هُ/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 هُما/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 هُم/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 ها/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 هُنَّ/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 كَ/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 كِ/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 كُما/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 كُم/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 كُنَّ/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 نِي/152 . 318
SFX 51 0 نا/152 . 318
SFX 60 Y 45
SFX 60 0 ْتُهُ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُهُما/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُهُم/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُها/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُهُنَّ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتَهُ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتَهُما/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتَهُم/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتَها/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتَهُنَّ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتِهِ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتِهِما/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتِهِم/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتِها/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتِهِنَّ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُكَ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُكِ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُكُما/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُكُم/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُكُنَّ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتَنِي/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتَنا/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتِنِي/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتِنا/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُماهُ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُماهُما/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُماهُم/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُماها/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُماهُنَّ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمانِي/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمانا/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمُوهُ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمُوهُما/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمُوهُم/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمُوها/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمُوهُنَّ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمُونِي/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُمُونا/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُنَّهُ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُنَّهُما/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُنَّهُم/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُنَّها/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُنَّهُنَّ/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُنَّنِي/152 . 319
SFX 60 0 ْتُنَّنا/152 . 319
SFX 265 Y 44
SFX 265 0 ه/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 هما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 هم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ها/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 هنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 كَ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 كِ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 كُما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 كُم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 كُنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 نا/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُهُ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُهُما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُهُم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُها/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُهُنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُكَ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُكِ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُكُما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُكُم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُكُنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ُنا/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َهُ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َهُما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َهُم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َها/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َهُنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َكَ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َكِ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َكُما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َكُم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َكُنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 َنا/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِهِ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِهِما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِهِم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِها/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِهِنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِكَ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِكِ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِكُما/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِكُم/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِكُنَّ/162 . 304
SFX 265 0 ِنا/162 . 304
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 0 ِ/162 . 224
SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 0/146 . 320
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 0/191 . 229
SFX 66 Y 1
SFX 66 0 0/152 . 320
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 آت/162 . 293
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 ِينَ/162 . 266
SFX 496 Y 7
SFX 496 0 هُ/145 . 263
SFX 496 0 هُما/145 . 263
SFX 496 0 هُم/145 . 263
SFX 496 0 ها/145 . 263
SFX 496 0 هُنَّ/145 . 263
SFX 496 0 نِي/145 . 263
SFX 496 0 نا/145 . 263
